California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 training, which shall include the techniques the licensee will use to prevent injury and maintain safety regarding consumers who are a danger to self or others and shall emphasize positive behavioral supports and techniques that are alternatives to physical restraints.

(B) Additional training for direct care staff to address the specialized needs of the consumers, including training in emergency interventions.

(2) Requirements and timelines for the development and updating of consumers’ individual behavior supports plans.

(3) Admission and continued stay requirements.

(4) Requirements for ensuring that appropriate services and supports are provided at the time of admission to meet the consumer’s immediate needs pending development of the consumer’s
 individual behavior supports plan.

(5) The rate methodology.

(6) Consumer rights and protections.

(b) The adoption, initial amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. These regulations shall be developed in consultation with system stakeholders. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this section. The emergency regulations may be
 readopted and remain in effect until approval of the certificate of compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 18.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Services and Supports for Persons Living in the Community [4685. - 4689.9.]

4685.

(a) Consistent with state and federal law, the Legislature finds and declares that children with developmental disabilities most often have greater opportunities for educational and social growth when they live with their families. The Legislature further finds and declares that the cost of providing necessary services and supports which enable a child with developmental disabilities to live at home is typically equal to or lower than the cost of providing out-of-home placement. The Legislature places a high priority on providing opportunities
 for children with developmental disabilities to live with their families, when living at home is the preferred objective in the child’s individual program plan.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that regional centers provide or secure family support services that do all of the following:

(1) Respect and support the decisionmaking authority of the family.

(2) Be flexible and creative in meeting the unique and individual needs of families as they evolve over time.

(3) Recognize and build on family strengths, natural supports, and existing community resources.

(4) Be designed to meet the cultural preferences, values, and lifestyles of families.

(5) Focus on the entire family and promote the inclusion of children with disabilities in all aspects of school and community.

(c) In order to provide opportunities for children to live with their families, the following procedures shall be adopted:

(1) The department and regional centers shall give a very high priority to the development and expansion of services and supports designed to assist families that are caring for their children at home, when that is the preferred objective in the individual program plan. This assistance may include, but is not limited to specialized medical and dental care, special training for parents, infant stimulation programs, respite for parents, homemaker services, camping, day care, short-term out-of-home care, child care, counseling, mental health services, behavior modification
 programs, special adaptive equipment such as wheelchairs, hospital beds, communication devices, and other necessary appliances and supplies, and advocacy to assist persons in securing income maintenance, educational services, and other benefits to which they are entitled.

(2) When children with developmental disabilities live with their families, the individual program plan shall include a family plan component which describes those services and supports necessary to successfully maintain the child at home. Regional centers shall consider every possible way to assist families in maintaining their children at home, when living at home will be in the best interest of the child, before considering out-of-home placement alternatives. When the regional center first becomes aware that a family may consider an out-of-home placement, or is in need of additional specialized services to assist in caring for the child in the home, the regional center
 shall meet with the family to discuss the situation and the family’s current needs, solicit from the family what supports would be necessary to maintain the child in the home, and utilize creative and innovative ways of meeting the family’s needs and providing adequate supports to keep the family together, if possible.

(3) (A) To ensure that these services and supports are provided in the most cost-effective and beneficial manner, regional centers may utilize innovative service-delivery mechanisms, including, but not limited to, vouchers; alternative respite options such as foster families, vacant community facility beds, crisis child care facilities; group training for parents on behavioral intervention techniques in lieu of some or all of the in-home parent training component of the behavioral intervention services; purchase of neighborhood preschool services and needed qualified personnel in lieu of infant development
 programs; and alternative child care options such as supplemental support to generic child care facilities and parent child care cooperatives.

(B) Effective July 1, 2009, at the time of development, review, or modification of a child’s individualized family service plan or individual program plan, the regional center shall consider both of the following:

(i) The use of group training for parents on behavioral intervention techniques in lieu of some or all of the in-home parent training component of the behavioral intervention services.

(ii) The purchase of neighborhood preschool services and needed qualified personnel in lieu of infant development programs.

(4) If the parent of any child receiving services and supports from a regional center believes
 that the regional center is not offering adequate assistance to enable the family to keep the child at home, the parent may initiate a request for fair hearing as established in this division. A family shall not be required to start a placement process or to commit to placing a child in order to receive requested services.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to encourage the continued residency of adult children in the home of their parents when that residency is not in the best interests of the person.

(6) When purchasing or providing a voucher for day care services for parents who are caring for children at home, the regional center may pay only the cost of the day care service that exceeds the cost of providing day care services to a child without disabilities. The regional center may pay in excess of this amount when a family can demonstrate a financial need and
 when doing so will enable the child to remain in the family home.

(7) A regional center may purchase or provide a voucher for diapers for children three years of age or older. A regional center may purchase or provide vouchers for diapers under three years of age when a family can demonstrate a financial need and when doing so will enable the child to remain in the family home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 17.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4685.1.

(a) When a minor child requires a living arrangement outside of the family home, as determined in the individual program plan developed pursuant to Section 4646 and Section 4648, the regional center shall make every effort to secure a living arrangement, consistent with the individual program plan, in reasonably close proximity to the family home.

(b) When the parents or guardian of a minor child requests that an out-of-home living arrangement for a minor child be in close
 proximity to the family home, and when such a living arrangement cannot be secured by the regional center, the regional center shall include with the individual program plan a written statement of its efforts to locate, develop, or adapt appropriate services and supports in a living arrangement within close proximity to the family home and what steps will be taken by the regional center to develop the services and supports necessary to return the child to the family home or within close proximity of the family home. This statement shall be updated every six months, or as agreed to by the parents or guardians, and a copy shall be forwarded to the parents or guardians of the minor and to the director of the department.

(c) This section shall not be construed to impede the movement of consumers to other geographic areas or the preference of the parent or guardian for the placement of their minor child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4685.7.

(a) Contingent upon approval of a federal waiver, the Self-Directed Services Program (SDS Program) is hereby established and shall be available in every regional center catchment area to provide participants, within an individual budget, greater control over needed services and supports. The Self-Directed Services Program shall be consistent with the requirements set forth in this section. In order to provide opportunities to participate in the program, the department shall adopt regulations, consistent with federal law, to implement the procedures set forth in this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of
 the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Financial management services” means a service or function that assists the participant to manage and direct the distribution of funds contained in the individual budget. This may include, but is not limited to, bill paying services and activities that facilitate the employment of service workers by the participant, including, but not limited to, federal, state, and local tax withholding payments, unemployment compensation fees, setting of wages and benefits, wage settlements, fiscal accounting, and expenditure reports. The department shall establish specific qualifications that shall be required of a financial management services provider.

(2) “Supports brokerage” means a service or function that assists participants in making informed decisions about the individual budget, and assists in locating, accessing and coordinating services consistent with and reflecting a participant’s needs and preferences. The service is available to assist in identifying immediate and long-term needs, developing options to meet those needs, participating in the person-centered planning process and development of the individual program plan, and obtaining identified supports and services.

(3) “Supports broker” means a person, selected and directed by the participant, who fulfills the supports brokerage service or function and assists the participant in the SDS Program. Specific qualifications shall be established by the department and required of a supports broker provider.

(4) “Waiver” means a waiver of federal law pursuant to Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(5) “Independence Plus Self-Directed (IPSD) Waiver Program” or “Self-Directed Waiver Program” means a federal waiver to the state’s Medicaid plan to allow a person with developmental disabilities who needs or requires long-term supports and services, and, when appropriate, the person’s family, greater opportunity to control their own health and well-being by utilization of self-directed services.

(6) (A) “Self-directed services” or “SDS” means a voluntary delivery system consisting of a defined and comprehensive mix of services and supports, selected and directed by a participant, in order to meet all or some of the objectives in
 their individual program plan. Self-directed services are designed to assist the participant to achieve personally defined outcomes in inclusive community settings.

(B) Self-directed services shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Home health aide services.

(ii) Supported employment and prevocational services.

(iii) Respite services.

(iv) Supports broker functions and services.

(v) Financial management services and functions.

(vi) Environmental accessibility adaptations.

(vii) Skilled nursing.

(viii) Transportation.

(ix) Specialized medical equipment and supplies.

(x) Personal emergency response system.

(xi) Integrative therapies.

(xii) Vehicle adaptations.

(xiii) Communication support.

(xiv) Crises intervention.

(xv) Nutritional consultation.

(xvi) Behavior intervention services.

(xvii) Specialized therapeutic services.

(xviii) Family assistance and support.

(xix) Housing access supports.

(xx) Community living supports, including, but not limited to, socialization, personal skill development, community participation, recreation, leisure, home and personal care.

(xxi) Advocacy services.

(xxii) Individual training and education.

(xxiii) Participant-designated goods and services.

(xxiv) Training and education transition services.

(C) The department shall include all of the services and supports listed in this paragraph in the IPSD Waiver Program application. Notwithstanding this paragraph, only services and supports included in an approved IPSD Waiver shall be funded through the SDS Program.

(7) “Advocacy services” means services and supports that facilitate the participant in exercising their legal, civil, and service rights to gain access to generic services and benefits that the participant is entitled to receive. Advocacy services shall only be provided when other sources of similar assistance are not available to the participant, and when advocacy is directed towards obtaining generic services.

(8) “Individual budget” means the amount of funding available to the participant for the purchase of services and supports necessary to implement an individual program plan. The individual budget shall be constructed using a fair, equitable, and transparent methodology.

(9) “Risk pool” means an account that is available for use in addressing the unanticipated needs of participants in the SDS Program.

(10) “Participant” means an individual, and, when appropriate,
 their parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, who have been deemed eligible for, and have voluntarily agreed to participate in, the SDS Program.

(c) Participation in the SDS Program is fully voluntary. A participant may choose to participate in, and may choose to leave, the SDS Program at any time. A regional center may not require participation in the SDS Program as a condition of eligibility for, or the delivery of, services and supports otherwise available under this division.

(d) The department shall develop informational materials about the SDS Program. The department shall ensure that regional centers are
 trained in the principles of SDS, the mechanics of the SDS
 Program, and the rights of consumers and families as candidates for, and participants, in the SDS Program. Regional centers shall conduct local meetings or forums to provide regional center consumers and families with information about the SDS Program. All consumers and families who express an interest in participating in the SDS program shall receive an in-depth orientation conducted by the regional center prior to enrollment in the program.

(e) Prior to enrollment in the SDS Program, and based on the
 methodologies described below, an individual, and, when appropriate, their parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, shall be provided in writing two individual budget amounts. If the individual, and, when
 appropriate, their parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, elects to become a participant in the SDS Program, the individual shall choose which of the two budget amounts provided will be used to implement their individual program plan.

(1) The methodologies and formulae for determining the two individual budget amounts shall be detailed in departmental regulations, as follows:

(A) One individual budget amount shall equal 90 percent of the annual purchase of services costs for the individual. The annual costs shall reflect the average annual costs for the previous two fiscal years for the individual.

(B) One individual budget amount shall equal 90 percent of the annual per capita purchase of service costs for the previous two fiscal years for consumers with similar characteristics, who do not receive services through the SDS Program, based on
 factors, including, but not limited to, age, type of residence, type of disability and ability, functional skills, and whether the individual is in transition. This budget methodology shall be constructed using data available on the State Department of Developmental Services information system.

(2) Once a participant has selected an individual budget amount, that individual budget amount shall be available to the participant each year for the purchase of self-directed services until a new individual budget amount has been determined. An individual budget amount shall be calculated no more than once in a 12-month period.

(3) As determined by the participant, the individual budget shall be distributed among the following budget categories in order to implement the IPP:

(A) Community Living.

(B) Health and Clinical Services.

(C) Employment.

(D) Training and Education.

(E) Environment and Medical Supports.

(F) Transportation.

(4) Annually, participants may transfer up to 10 percent of the funds originally distributed to any budget category set forth in paragraph (3), to another budget category or categories. Transfers in excess of 10 percent of the original amount allocated to any budget category may be made upon the approval of the regional center. Regional centers may only deny a transfer if necessary to protect the health and safety of the participant.

(5) The regional center shall annually ascertain from the participant whether there are any circumstances that require a change to the annual individual budget amount. The department shall detail in regulations the process by which this annual review shall be achieved.

(6) A regional center’s calculation of an individual budget amount may be appealed to the executive director of the regional center, or
 their designee, within 30 days after receipt of the budget amount. The executive director shall issue a written decision within 10 working days. The decision of the executive director may be appealed to the Director of Developmental Services, or their designee, within 15 days of receipt of the written decision. The decision of the department is final.

(f) The department shall establish a risk pool fund to meet the unanticipated needs of participants in the SDS Program. The fund shall be administered by the department. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of
 funding services and supports pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) The risk pool shall be funded at the equivalent of 5 percent of the historic annual purchase of service costs for consumers participating in the SDS Program.

(2) The risk pool shall be allocated by the department to regional centers through a process specified by the department.

(3) The risk pool may be used only in the event of substantial change in a participant’s service and support needs that were not known at the time the individual budget was set, including an urgent need to relocate a residence, and catastrophic injury or illness.

(4) The risk pool may be accessed by a participant more than once in a lifetime.

(g) In
 the first year of the SDS Program, the department shall provide for establishment of savings to the General Fund equivalent to 5 percent of the historic annual purchase of service costs for SDS program participants. In subsequent fiscal years, the department shall annually provide for establishment of savings to the General Fund equivalent to 5 percent of the annual purchase of services costs for SDS Program participants, averaged over the prior two fiscal years.

(h) A regional center may advance funds to a financial management services entity pursuant to SDS Program regulations to facilitate development of a participant’s individual budget and transition into the SDS Program.

(i) Participation in the SDS Program shall be available to any regional center consumer who meets all of
 the following eligibility requirements:

(1) The participant is three years of age or older.

(2) The participant has a developmental disability, as defined in Section 4512.

(3) The participant does not live in a licensed long-term health care facility, as defined in paragraph (44) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or a residential facility, as defined in paragraph (55) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or receive day program or habilitation services, as defined in paragraph (16) or (34) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, respectively. An individual,
 and, when appropriate,
 their parent, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, who is not eligible to participate in the SDS Program pursuant to this paragraph may request that the regional center provide person-centered planning services in order to make arrangements for transition to the SDS Program. In that case, the regional center shall initiate person-centered planning services within 60 days of a request.

(4) The participant agrees to all of the following terms and conditions:

(A) The participant shall undergo an in-depth orientation to the SDS Program prior to enrollment.

(B) The participant shall agree to utilize the services and supports available within the SDS Program only when generic services cannot be accessed, and except for Medi-Cal state plan benefits when applicable.

(C) The participant shall consent to use only services necessary to implement their individual program plan as described in the IPSD Waiver Program, and as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), as an available service in the SDS Program, and shall agree to comply with any and all other terms and conditions for participation in the SDS Program described in this section.

(D) The participant shall manage self-directed services within the individual budget
 amount, chosen pursuant to subdivision (e).

(E) The participant shall utilize the services of a financial management services entity of
 their own choosing. A financial management services provider may either be hired or designated by the participant. A designated financial management services provider shall perform services on a nonpaid basis. An individual or a parent of an individual in the SDS Program shall provide financial management services only as a designated provider and only if the capacity to fulfill the roles and responsibilities as described in the financial management services provider qualifications can be demonstrated to the regional center.

(F) The participant shall utilize the services of a supports broker of their own choosing for the purpose of providing services and functions as described in paragraphs (2) and (3)
 of subdivision (b). A supports broker may either be hired or designated by the participant. A designated supports broker shall perform support brokerage services on a nonpaid basis. An individual or a parent of an individual in the SDS Program shall provide supports brokerage services or
 their designated representative shall provide the services only as a designated provider and only if the capacity to fulfill the role and responsibilities as described in the supports broker provider qualifications can be demonstrated to the financial management services entity.

(j) A participant who is not Medi-Cal eligible may participate in the SDS Program without IPSD Waiver Program enrollment and receive self-directed services if all other IPSD Waiver Program eligibility requirements are met.

(k) The planning team, established pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 4512, shall utilize the person-centered planning process to develop the Individual Program Plan (IPP) for an SDS participant. The IPP shall detail the goals and objectives of the participant that are to be met through the purchase of participant selected services and
 supports.

(l) The participant shall implement
 their IPP, including choosing the services and supports allowable under this section necessary to implement the plan. A regional center may not prohibit the purchase of any service or support that is otherwise allowable under this section.

(m) An adult may designate an authorized representative to effect the implementation. The representative shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) They shall demonstrate knowledge and understanding of the participant’s needs and preferences.

(2) They
 shall be willing and able to comply with SDS Program requirements.

(3) They shall be at least 18 years of age.

(4) They shall be approved by the participant to act in the capacity of a representative.

(n) The participant, or
 their authorized
 representative, and the regional center case manager shall receive a monthly budget statement that describes the amount of funds allocated by budget category, the amount spent in the previous 30-day period, and the amount of funding that remains available under the participant’s individual budget.

(o) If at any time during participation in the SDS Program a regional center determines that an individual is no longer eligible to continue based on the criteria described in subdivision (i), or a participant voluntarily chooses to exit the SDS Program, the regional center shall provide for the participant’s transition from the SDS Program to other services and supports. This shall include the development of a new individual program plan that reflects the services and supports necessary to meet the individual’s needs. The regional center shall ensure that there is no gap in services and supports during the
 transition period.

(1) Upon determination of ineligibility pursuant to this subdivision, the regional center shall inform the participant in writing of their ineligibility, the reason for the determination of ineligibility, and shall provide a written notice of the fair hearing rights, as required by Section 4701.

(2) An individual determined ineligible, or an individual
 who voluntarily exits the SDS Program, shall be permitted to return to the SDS Program upon meeting all applicable eligibility criteria and after a minimum of 12 months’ time has elapsed.

(p) A participant in the SDS Program shall have all the rights established in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700), except as provided under paragraph (6) of subdivision (e).

(q) Only a financial management services provider is required to apply for vendorization in accordance with Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 54300) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the
 California Code of Regulations, for the SDS Program. All other service providers shall have applicable state licenses, certifications, or other state required documentation, but are exempt from the vendorization requirements set forth in Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. The financial management services entity shall ensure and document that all service providers meet specified requirements for any service that may be delivered to the participant.

(r) A participant in the SDS Program may request, at no charge to the participant or the regional center, criminal history background checks for persons seeking employment as a service provider and providing direct care services to the participant.

(1) Criminal history records checks pursuant to this subdivision shall be performed and administered as described in subdivision (b) and subdivisions (d) to (h), inclusive, of
 Section 4689.2, and Sections 4689.4 to 4689.6, inclusive, and shall apply to vendorization of providers and hiring of employees to provide services for family home agencies and family homes.

(2) The department may enter into a written agreement with the Department of Justice to implement this subdivision.

(s) Notwithstanding any provision of law, an individual receiving services and supports under the self-determination projects established pursuant to
 former Section 4685.5 may elect to continue to receive self-determination services within their current scope and existing procedures and parameters. Participation in a self-determination project pursuant to former Section 4685.5 may only be terminated upon a participant’s voluntary election and qualification to receive services under another delivery system.

(t) Each regional center shall be responsible for implementing an SDS Program as a term of its contract under Section 4629.

(u) The department shall annually provide the following information to the policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature:

(1) Number and characteristics of participants, by regional center.

(2) Types and ranking of services and supports purchased under the
 SDS Program, by regional center.

(3) Range and average of individual budgets, by regional center.

(4) Utilization of the risk pool, including range and average individual budget augmentations and type of service, by regional centers.

(5) Information regarding consumer satisfaction under the SDS Program and, when data is available, the traditional service delivery system, by regional center.

(6) The proportion of participants who report that their choices and decisions are respected and supported.

(7) The proportion of participants who report they are able to recruit and hire qualified service providers.

(8) The number and
 outcome of individual budget appeals, by regional center.

(9) The number and outcome of fair hearing appeals, by regional center.

(10) The number of participants who voluntarily withdraw from participation in the SDS Program and a summary of the reasons why, by regional center.

(11) The number of participants who are subsequently determined to no longer be eligible for the SDS Program and a summary of the reasons why, by regional center.

(12) Identification of barriers to participation and recommendations for program improvements.

(13) A comparison of average annual expenditures for individuals with similar characteristics not participating in the SDS
 Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 10.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4685.8.

(a) The department shall implement a statewide Self-Determination Program. The Self-Determination Program shall be available in every regional center catchment area to provide participants and their families, within an individual budget, increased flexibility and choice, and greater control over decisions, resources, and needed and desired services and supports to implement their IPP. As of July 1, 2021, the program shall begin to be available on a voluntary basis to all regional center consumers who are eligible for the Self-Determination Program.

(b) The department, in establishing the statewide program, shall do both of the following:

(1) Set targets and benchmarks as set forth in paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (r).

(2) Address all of the following:

(A) Oversight of expenditure of self-determined funds and the achievement of participant outcomes over time.

(B) Increased participant control over which services and supports best meet the participant’s needs and the IPP objectives. A participant’s unique support system may include the purchase of existing service offerings from service providers or local businesses, hiring their own support workers, or negotiating unique service arrangements with local community resources.

(C) Comprehensive person-centered planning, including an individual budget and services that are outcome based.

(D) Consumer and family training to ensure
 understanding of the principles of self-determination, the planning process, and the management of budgets, services, and staff.

(E) Choice of independent facilitators, who meet standards and certification requirements established by the department, and who can assist with the functions specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(F) Choice of financial management services providers who meet standards and certification requirements established by the department, and who can carry out the functions specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(G) Innovation that will more effectively allow participants to achieve their goals.

(H) Long-term sustainability of the Self-Determination Program by doing all of the following:

(i) Requiring IPP teams, when developing the individual budget, to determine the services, supports, and goods necessary for each consumer based on the needs and preferences of the consumer, and when appropriate the consumer’s family; the effectiveness of each option in meeting the goals specified in the IPP; the cost effectiveness of each option, as specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648; and the utilization of available generic services, as defined by the department.

(ii) The department may review final individual budgets that are at or above a spending threshold determined by the department of all individual budgets and use information from its review in the aggregate to develop additional program guidance and verify compliance with federal and state laws and other requirements.

(I) Reduce barriers to participation and improve equity in enrollment by establishing, with community input, no later than March 1, 2027, statewide standardized processes and procedures, including, but not limited to, timelines for these processes and procedures. Input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities Statewide Self‑Determination Advisory Committee, and legislative staff and shall include adequate notice, or 45 days at a minimum, for the community to review and provide feedback on draft processes and procedures, with review and consideration by the department of feedback prior to finalization for the March 1, 2027, deadline. The standardized processes and procedures shall be consistently applied by regional centers. The standardized processes and procedures
 shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Enrollment.

(ii) Individual budgets.

(iii) Spending plans.

(iv) Financial management services.

(v) Access to transition supports.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Financial management services” means services or functions that assist the participant to manage and direct the distribution of funds contained in the individual budget, and ensure that the participant has the financial resources to implement their IPP throughout the year. These may include bill
 paying services and activities that facilitate the employment of service and support workers by the participant, including, but not limited to, fiscal accounting, tax withholding, compliance with relevant state and federal employment laws, assisting the participant in verifying provider qualifications, including criminal background checks, and expenditure reports. The financial management services provider shall meet the applicable requirements of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations and other specific qualifications or certifications established by the department.

(2) “Independent facilitator” means a person, selected and directed by the participant, who is not otherwise providing services to the participant pursuant to their IPP and is not employed by a person providing services to the participant. The independent facilitator may assist the participant in making informed decisions about the individual budget, and in locating,
 accessing, and coordinating services and supports consistent with the participant’s IPP. The independent facilitator is available to assist in identifying immediate and long-term needs, developing options to meet those needs, leading, participating, or advocating on behalf of the participant in the person-centered planning process and development of the IPP, and obtaining identified services and supports. The cost of the independent facilitator, if any, shall be paid by the participant out of the participant’s individual budget. An independent facilitator shall receive training in the principles of self-determination, the person-centered planning process, and the other responsibilities described in this paragraph at the independent facilitator’s own cost. The independent facilitator shall meet standards and certification requirements established by the department.

(3) “Individual budget” means the amount of regional center purchase of service
 funding available to the participant for the purchase of services and supports necessary to implement the IPP. The individual budget shall be determined using a fair, equitable, and transparent methodology.

(4) “IPP” means individual program plan, as described in Section 4646.

(5) “Participant” means an individual, and when appropriate, the participant’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, who has been deemed eligible for, and has voluntarily agreed to participate in, the Self-Determination Program.

(6) “Self-determination” means a voluntary delivery system consisting of a defined and comprehensive mix of services and supports, selected and directed by a participant through person-centered planning, in order to meet the objectives in their IPP. Self-determination services and
 supports are designed to assist the participant to achieve personally defined outcomes in community settings that promote inclusion. The Self-Determination Program shall only fund services and supports provided pursuant to this division that the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines are eligible for federal financial participation.

(7) “Spending plan” means the plan the participant develops to use their available individual budget funds to purchase goods, services, and supports necessary to implement their individual program plan (IPP). The spending plan shall identify the cost of each good, service, and support that will be purchased with regional center funds. The total amount of the spending plan cannot exceed the amount of the individual budget. A copy of the spending plan shall be attached to the participant’s IPP.

(d) Participation in the